Washington statutes.
RCW 35.60.010

"Municipality" defined.

"Municipality" as used in this chapter, means any political subdivision or municipal corporation of the state.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.60.010. Prior: 1961 c 149 s 1; prior: 1961 c 39 s 1.]